Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.190

Credit for military service.

Each person affected by this chapter who at the time of entering the armed services was a member of this system, and has honorably served in the armed services of the United States, shall have added to the period of service as computed under this chapter, the period of service in the armed forces: PROVIDED, That such credited service shall not exceed five years.

[ 1991 c 35 s 26; 1970 ex.s. c 6 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 18.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.